Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2106
Tax; proceeds; credited to General Fund.

All the proceeds from the levy and imposition of the transfer or excise tax shall be paid to the Tax Commissioner who shall remit the proceeds to the State Treasurer for credit to the General Fund.

Laws 1929, c. 73, § 6, p. 255;

C.S.1929, § 77-2306;

Laws 1937, c. 175, § 1, p. 689;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2306;

R.S.1943, § 77-2106;

Laws 1949, c. 229, § 5, p. 637;

Laws 1949, c. 243, § 3, p. 660;

Laws 1975, LB 233, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 480, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1004, § 10.